trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<pardef n="/iĝi__vbntr">
  <e>       <p><l>iĝi</l>       <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝas</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝis</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝos</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintajn</l>  <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝanta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝantaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝantan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝantajn</l>  <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝanta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝantan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝonta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝonta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝontaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝante</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinte</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝu</l>       <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝanta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝantaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝanta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝi</l>       <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝas</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝis</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝos</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintajn</l>  <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝanta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝantaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝantan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝantajn</l>  <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝanta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝantan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝonta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝonta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝontaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝante</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinte</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝu</l>       <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝanta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝantaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝanta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>igi</l>       <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igas</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igis</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igos</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igus</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igus</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igintaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igintan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igintajn</l>  <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igintan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="fariĝi">                <i>far</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="albordiĝi">            <i>albord</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="diplomiĝi">            <i>diplom</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="alklimatiĝi">            <i>alklimat</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="alproksimiĝi">            <i>alproksim</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="amikiĝi">            <i>amik</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="aniĝi">            <i>an</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="arkaikiĝi">            <i>arkaik</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="aŭtomatiĝi">            <i>aŭtomat</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="bastardiĝi">            <i>bastard</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="baziĝi">            <i>baz</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="buliĝi">            <i>bul</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="cikatriĝi">            <i>cikatr</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="decidiĝi">            <i>decid</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="dekliniĝi">            <i>deklin</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="destukiĝi">            <i>destuk</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="deturniĝi">            <i>deturn</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="deĉevaliĝi">            <i>deĉeval</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="disfadeniĝi">            <i>disfaden</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="disvolviĝi">            <i>disvolv</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="edziniĝi">            <i>edzin</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="efektiviĝi">            <i>efektiv</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="eksiĝi">            <i>eks</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="ekstaziĝi">            <i>ekstaz</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="elteriĝi">            <i>elter</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="elvaporiĝi">            <i>elvapor</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="enabismiĝi">            <i>enabism</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="enlitiĝi">            <i>enlit</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="enprofundiĝi">            <i>enprofund</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="fendiĝi">            <i>fend</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="flaviĝi">            <i>flav</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="frue ellitiĝi">            <i>frue<b/>ellit</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="grupiĝi">            <i>grup</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="troviĝi">            <i>trov</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="kazeiĝi">            <i>kaze</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="konsumiĝi">            <i>konsum</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="kuniĝi">            <i>kun</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="leviĝi">            <i>lev</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="malfortiĝi">            <i>malfort</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="malpliboniĝi">            <i>malplibon</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="maltrankviliĝi">            <i>maltrankvil</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="moviĝi">            <i>mov</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="nomiĝi">            <i>nom</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="paliĝi">            <i>pal</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="pligraviĝi">            <i>pligrav</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="pretiĝi">            <i>pret</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="realiĝi">            <i>real</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="resaniĝi">            <i>resan</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="ringiĝi">            <i>ring</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="saniĝi">            <i>san</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="sentoksiĝi">            <i>sentoks</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="spikiĝi">            <i>spik</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="superbordiĝi">            <i>superbord</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="surmariĝi">            <i>surmar</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="trankviliĝi">            <i>trankvil</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="vantiĝi">            <i>vant</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="vidviĝi">            <i>vidv</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="etendiĝi">            <i>etend</i><par n="/iĝi__vbntr"/></e>
